Illinois, session 104th, SB3832.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Sections 5H-1, 5H-3, and 5H-7 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5H-1)7    Sec. 5H-1. Definitions. As used in this Article: 8    "Base year" means the 12-month period from January 1, 2023 9to December 31, 2023.10    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 11Services.12    "Federal employee health benefit" means the program of 13health benefits plans, as defined in 5 U.S.C. 8901, available 14to federal employees under 5 U.S.C. 8901 to 8914.15    "Fund" means the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund.16    "Managed care organization" means an entity operating 17under a certificate of authority issued pursuant to the Health 18Maintenance Organization Act or as a Managed Care Community 19Network pursuant to Section 5-11 of this Code, or as a 20preferred provider organization.21    "Medicaid managed care organization" means a managed care 22organization under contract with the Department to provide 23services to recipients of benefits in the medical assistance   SB3832- 2 -LRB104 20217 KTG 33668 b1program pursuant to Article V of this Code, the Children's 2Health Insurance Program Act, or the Covering ALL KIDS Health 3Insurance Act. It does not include contracts the same entity 4or an affiliated entity has for other business.5    "Medicare" means the federal Medicare program established 6under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act.7    "Member months" means the aggregate total number of months 8all individuals are enrolled for coverage in a Managed Care 9Organization during the base year. Member months are 10determined by the Department for Medicaid Managed Care 11Organizations based on enrollment data in its Medicaid 12Management Information System and by the Department of 13Insurance for other Managed Care Organizations based on 14required filings with the Department of Insurance. Member 15months do not include months individuals are enrolled in a 16Limited Health Services Organization, including stand-alone 17dental or vision plans, a Medicare Advantage Plan, a Medicare 18Supplement Plan, or a Federal Employee Health Benefits Plan.19(Source: P.A. 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 20    (305 ILCS 5/5H-3)21    Sec. 5H-3. Managed care assessment.22    (a) There is imposed upon managed care organization member 23months an assessment, calculated on base year data, as set 24forth below for the appropriate tier: 25        (1) Tier 1: $78.90 per member month.  SB3832- 3 -LRB104 20217 KTG 33668 b1        (2) Tier 2: $1.40 per member month.2        (3) Tier 3: $2.40 per member month.3    (b) The tiers are established as follows:4        (1) Tier 1 includes the first 4,195,000 member months 5    in a Medicaid managed care organization for the base year;6        (2) Tier 2 includes member months over 4,195,000 in a 7    Medicaid managed care organization during the base year; 8    and9        (3) Tier 3 includes member months during the base year 10    in a managed care organization that is not a Medicaid 11    managed care organization.12    (c) For State fiscal year 2020, and for each State fiscal 13year thereafter, the Department may adjust rates or tier 14parameters or both in order to maximize the revenue generated 15by the assessment consistent with federal regulations and to 16meet federal statistical tests necessary for federal financial 17participation. Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department may 18implement a tax that is based on uniform rates, determined at a 19level not to exceed limitations imposed by the federal Centers 20for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that may be set at either a 21percentage of premium revenue or on a per member per month 22basis. Any upward adjustment to the Tier 3 rate shall be the 23minimum necessary to meet federal statistical tests.24(Source: P.A. 103-593, eff. 6-7-24.) 25    (305 ILCS 5/5H-7)  SB3832- 4 -LRB104 20217 KTG 33668 b1    Sec. 5H-7. Rulemaking. The Department may by rule modify 2or make adjustments to any methodology, assessment amount, 3assessment tier, or other similar provision specified in this 4Article, including broadening the tax base in subsection (a) 5of Section 5H-3, to the extent necessary to meet the 6requirements of federal law or regulations, obtain federal 7approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is 8available. However, upward adjustments to Tier 3 rates shall 9be the minimum necessary to meet federal statistical tests to 10receive federal financial participation. The Department shall 11adopt rules to implement this Article under the Illinois 12Administrative Procedure Act.13(Source: P.A. 101-9, eff. 6-5-19.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.